District of Columbia statutes.
20-352

Petition.

Any person eligible for appointment as the personal representative of an estate pursuant to section 20-303 may file a verified petition for administration of a small estate. Such petition shall contain, in addition to the information required by section 20-304 :

(a)

A statement that the petitioner has made a diligent search to discover all property and debts of the decedent;

(b)

A list of the known creditors of the decedent, with the amount of each claim, including contingent and disputed claim; and

(c)

A statement of any legal proceedings pending in which the decedent was a party.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
1981 Ed., § 20-352.